Massachusetts, session 194th, H1390.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 9C of Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding at the end 
thereof the following: 
"All MassHealth Managed Care Organizations and Accountable Care Organizations are 
required to reimburse pharmacies at the same rate as described in the MassHealth Pharmacy 
Provider Manual. 
The Commissioner of the Division of Insurance and the Secretary of Health and Human 
Services shall promulgate regulations to enforce the provisions of this act."